Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB654.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 519(b) of the act of August 26, 1971 (P.L.351, No.91), known as the State Lottery Law, is amended to read:Section 519. The Pharmaceutical Assistance Contract for the Elderly Needs Enhancement Tier.* * *(b) PACENET eligibility.--A person with an annual income of not less than $14,500 and not more than [$33,500] $45,000 in the case of a single person and of not less than $17,700 and not 1234567891011121314151617181920 more than [$41,500] $5 5,000 in the case of the combined income of persons married to each other shall be eligible for enhanced pharmaceutical assistance under this section. A person may, in reporting income to the department, round the amount of each source of income and the income total to the nearest whole dollar, whereby any amount which is less than 50¢ is eliminated.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0654PN0663 - 2 - 12345678